apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="sa/nie__n">
  <e>       <p><l>nie</l>       <r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ń</l>         <r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>niom</l>      <r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nie</l>       <r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>niami</l>     <r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>niach</l>     <r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nie</l>       <r>nie<s n="n"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="wąg/ier__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rowi</l>      <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rem</l>       <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rze</l>       <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rze</l>       <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ry</l>        <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rów</l>       <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rom</l>       <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rami</l>      <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rach</l>      <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ry</l>        <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ry</l>        <r>ier<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="umy/sł__n">
  <e>       <p><l>sł</l>        <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słu</l>       <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słowi</l>     <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sł</l>        <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słem</l>      <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śle</l>       <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śle</l>       <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sły</l>       <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słów</l>      <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słom</l>      <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słami</l>     <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słach</l>     <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sły</l>       <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sły</l>       <r>sł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ko/cioł__n">
  <e>       <p><l>cioł</l>      <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tła</l>       <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tłowi</l>     <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tłem</l>      <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tle</l>       <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tle</l>       <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tły</l>       <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tłów</l>      <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tłom</l>      <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tłami</l>     <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tłach</l>     <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cioł</l>      <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tły</l>       <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tły</l>       <r>cioł<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kości/ół__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ół</l>        <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oła</l>       <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołowi</l>     <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołem</l>      <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ele</l>       <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ele</l>       <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oły</l>       <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołów</l>      <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołom</l>      <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołami</l>     <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołach</l>     <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ół</l>        <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oły</l>       <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oły</l>       <r>ół<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cie/ń__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ń<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__cień_sg"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__słoń_pl"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tyto/ń__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ń<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__cień_sg"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__słoń_pl"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="modrzew__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iowi</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iem</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iu</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iu</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iom</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iami</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iach</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="cień">            <i>cie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="deseń">           <i>dese</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="grzebień">        <i>grzebie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="grzybień">        <i>grzybie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="jęczmień">        <i>jęczmie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="kamień">          <i>kamie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="kocioł">          <i>ko</i><par n="ko/cioł__n"/></e>
<e lm="korzeń">          <i>korze</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="kościół">         <i>kości</i><par n="kości/ół__n"/></e>
<e lm="krzemień">        <i>krzemie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="modrzew">         <i>modrzew</i><par n="modrzew__n"/></e>
<e lm="namysł">          <i>namy</i><par n="umy/sł__n"/></e>
<e lm="odcień">          <i>odcie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="pierścień">       <i>pierście</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="pomysł">          <i>pomy</i><par n="umy/sł__n"/></e>
<e lm="promień">         <i>promie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="przemysł">        <i>przemy</i><par n="umy/sł__n"/></e>
<e lm="płomień">         <i>płomie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="rdzeń">           <i>rdze</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="strumień">        <i>strumie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="tytoń">           <i>tyto</i><par n="tyto/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="umysł">           <i>umy</i><par n="umy/sł__n"/></e>
<e lm="wapń">            <i>wap</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="wapień">          <i>wapie</i><par n="cie/ń__n"/></e>
<e lm="zmysł">           <i>zmy</i><par n="umy/sł__n"/></e>
<e lm="sanie">           <i>sa</i><par n="sa/nie__n"/></e>
<e lm="domysł">          <i>domy</i><par n="umy/sł__n"/></e>
